Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8307
Licensure, defined.

Licensure means the permission granted by the state to provide health care services or human services to the public which would otherwise be unlawful without such permission and which is granted to facilities which meet prerequisite qualifications pertinent to public health, safety, and welfare.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 113.